Washington statutes.
RCW 16.67.140

Livestock purchasers to provide list of sellers to commission.

The commission may adopt regulations requiring the purchasers of livestock subject to the assessments under this chapter, to furnish the commission with the names of persons from whom such livestock was purchased. Refusal or failure to furnish the commission with such a list shall constitute a misdemeanor.

[ 1969 c 133 s 13.]